Idaho, session 2026, H0826.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-2803, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2803. DEFINITIONS. Whenever used or referred to in this chapter,
unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:
(1) "Commission" means the Idaho honey commission.
(2) "Department" means the Idaho state department of agriculture.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's
designated representative.
(2) (4) "Honey producer" or "beekeeper" means a person, firm or corpo-
ration engaged in the art of raising, harboring, keeping or breeding domes-
ticated honey bees either for the purpose of gathering honey or the produc-
tion of queens and/or packaged bees.
(3) (5) "Honey by-products" means items using honey as a base such as
creamed honey, whipped honey, or the like.
(4) (6) "Packer" means any honey producer or beekeeper or person who
processes and packs honey for commercial retail sales.
(5) (7) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, corporation,
firm, association and agent.


(6) "Director" means the director of the Idaho state department of
agriculture or his designated representative.
(7) (8) "Official sample" means a sample of honey taken by the director
or an authorized agent in accordance with the provisions of section 22-2810,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 22-2804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2804. COMMISSION -- MEMBERS -- QUALIFICATIONS -- APPOINTMENT --
COMPENSATION. (1) There is hereby created and established in the department
of agriculture the Idaho honey commission to be known and designated as such,
and shall be composed of the director of the department and three (3) members
who shall be honey producers or beekeepers.
(2) Each member shall be a resident citizen of the state of Idaho for a
period of five (5) years prior to his appointment, shall be a commercial bee-
keeper as defined in section 22-2502, Idaho Code, actively engaged in honey
production, registered as a beekeeper with the Idaho department of agricul-
ture, and deriving a substantial portion of his income from honey produc-
tion, or be the directing or managing head of a corporation, firm, partner-
ship or other business unit that derives a substantial portion of its income
from honey production. To continue as a member of the commission each member
must remain qualified pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(3) The executive committee of the Idaho honey industry association may
request the removal of a commissioner, with or without cause, by a majority
vote. Upon receipt of such a request, the governor may immediately withdraw
the commissioner's appointment.
(4) The Idaho honey industry association shall meet for the purpose of
nominating members of the commission. The board of directors shall review
the names of active beekeepers in Idaho that meet the qualifications as pro-
vided in this section. By June 1 of each year, the names of two (2) honey pro-
ducers or beekeepers nominated by the association for each vacancy occurring
on the commission shall be submitted to the governor for his consideration.
From such list of nominees, the governor shall designate and appoint one (1)
member for each vacancy on the commission.
(5) Members shall serve for a term of three (3) years. Terms shall
expire on the last day of June of the year in which the term for which the
members member was appointed terminates. Provided however, each member
shall serve until his respective successor is appointed and qualified. Ap-
pointments to fill vacancies shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
On and after the effective date of this act, terms that are currently vacant
or held by the commission members shall expire and be filled on the following
schedule: one (1) member term shall expire on June 30, 2015; one (1) member
term shall expire on June 30, 2016; and one (1) member term shall expire on
June 30, 2017.
(6) Commission members shall elect a chairman. The chairman may del-
egate the function of the Idaho honey commission to an administrator whose
function will be subject to the approval of the Idaho honey commission.
(7) A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quo-
rum for the transaction of all business and the carrying out of the duties of
the commission. Before entering on the discharge of their duties as members


of the commission, each member shall take and subscribe to the oath of office
prescribed by law.
(8) Each member of the commission shall be compensated as provided by
section 59-509(n), Idaho Code. The commission shall meet regularly once
each fiscal year at a date established by said commission in its designated
business office, and it shall fix the time and place of special meetings as
may be deemed necessary by the chairman of the commission.
SECTION 3. That Section 22-2807, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2807. DUTIES. The commission shall set honey quality, identity and
labeling standards by rule, plan and conduct a campaign for honey and honey
by-product advertising, publicity, merchandising, sales promotion and re-
search, including bee research, and public education of beekeeping and honey
production, by contracting with a service of the hereinabove mentioned, or
jointly with any university or other state agency or states of the United
States and its territories, or individually.
SECTION 4. That Section 22-2808, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 22-2809, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2809. LEVY AND COLLECTION OF TAXES -- CHANGE OF TAX BY REFERENDUM
-- VIOLATIONS -- PENALTY. (1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon each
colony or hive of bees within the state of Idaho on July 1 of each year a con-
tinuing annual tax of five cents (5¢) per hive or colony of bees beginning in
the year 1970 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
Hobbyist beekeepers, as defined in chapter 25, title 22, Idaho Code, are ex-
empt from taxation under this section. Provided however, that any hobbyist
beekeeper who desires to support the efforts of the commission, as set forth
in section 22-2807, Idaho Code, and desires to be included in registration
lists distributed as authorized under section 22-2815, Idaho Code, may reg-
ister with the commission for that purpose by remitting an annual registra-
tion fee of ten dollars ($10.00).
(2) The tax may be decreased to not less than three cents (3¢) per hive
or colony per year or it may be increased to not more than ten cents (10¢) per
hive or colony per year, if approved by a majority of the beekeepers voting in
a referendum held for the purpose of determining whether such levy of the tax
shall or shall not be changed. If the levy of the tax is changed, the levy of
the tax will continue annually at the changed rate until again changed by an-
other referendum. Any resident of Idaho who is a registered Idaho beekeeper
with the department of agriculture, and is not exempt from taxation as pro-
vided in subsection (1) of this section, may vote at such referendum. Any
referendum held for the purpose of changing the levy of such tax shall be held
at the annual meeting of the Idaho honey industry association or any succes-
sor organization to this group.
(3) Notice of the tax provided for in this section shall be mailed no
later than June 1 and the tax shall be due and payable on or before July 1 of


each year, and it shall be collected by the Idaho department of agriculture
and shall forthwith be paid over by the Idaho department of agriculture to
the Idaho honey fund.
(4) Said tax shall be a lien upon all apicultural products, equipment,
bees and property of the person owning or controlling such bees and shall
be prior to all other liens or encumbrances except liens which are declared
prior by operation of the statutes of this state.
(5) Hives brought into the state for indoor winter storage prior to mov-
ing to another state for pollination or honey production are exempt from pay-
ing fees and taxes as provided for in this section. Provided however, reg-
istration shall be required and a minimum of the following information shall
be supplied: location of the storage, approximate dates the hive or hives
will be brought into and leave the state, name, address and telephone num-
ber of the owner of the bees, and name, address and telephone number of an
in-state contact who will have knowledge of the hive or hives being stored in
the state.
SECTION 6. That Section 22-2810, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2810. SAMPLING AND ANALYSIS. (1) For the purpose of enforcement of
this chapter, and in order to determine whether its provisions have been com-
plied with, including whether or not any operations may be subject to such
provisions, officers or employees duly designated by the director or com-
mission upon presenting appropriate credentials, to the owner, operator, or
agent in charge, are authorized upon written complaint:
(a) To enter, during normal business hours, any factory, warehouse, or
establishment within the state in which honey is processed, packed, or
held for distribution for retail sales, or to enter any vehicle being
used to transport or hold such honey, and sample such honey that is pack-
aged and labeled for retail sale.
(b) To inspect at reasonable times and within reasonable limits and in
a reasonable manner, such factory, warehouse, establishment or vehicle
and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, con-
tainers, and labeling therein, related to retail sales. The inspection
may include the verification of only such records, and production and
control procedures as may be necessary to determine compliance with the
good manufacturing practice rules established under the provisions of
this chapter United States standards for grades of extracted honey.
Each inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable
promptness. Upon completion of the inspection, the person in charge of
the facility or vehicle shall be so notified.
(2) Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with methods
prescribed in rules, or in accordance with other generally recognized meth-
ods the United States standards for grades of extracted honey.
(3) The director or commission, in determining for administrative pur-
poses whether a honey is adulterated, shall be guided by the official sample
as defined in subsection (7) of section 22-2803, Idaho Code, and obtained and
analyzed as provided for in this section.
(4) If the owner of any factory, warehouse, or establishment described
in subsection (1) of this section, or authorized agent, refuses to admit the


director, commission or an authorized agent to inspect in accordance with
subsections (1) and (5) of this section, the director or commission is autho-
rized to obtain from any state court of competent jurisdiction a warrant di-
recting such owner or agent to submit the premises described in such warrant
to inspection.
(5) For the enforcement of this chapter, the director, commission or
a duly authorized agent is authorized to enter upon any public or private
premises including any vehicle of transport during regular business hours
to have access to, and to obtain samples, and to examine and make copies of
records relating to distribution of honey packaged and labeled for retail
sale to the public.
(6) The results of all analyses of official samples shall be forwarded
by the director or commission to the packer and to the purchaser or retailer.
When the inspection and analysis of an official sample indicate the honey has
been adulterated or mislabeled, and upon request by the packer or purchaser
or retailer within thirty (30) days following the receipt of the analysis,
the director or commission shall furnish to the packer or purchaser or re-
tailer a portion of the sample concerned.
SECTION 7. That Section 22-2811, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Chapter 28, Title 22, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 22-2811, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
22-2811. PENALTIES FOR VIOLATIONS. (1) Any person that violates or
fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter may be assessed
a civil penalty by the department or its duly authorized agent of no more
than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each offense and shall be liable for
reasonable attorney's fees.
(2) Assessment of a civil penalty may be made in conjunction with any
other department administrative action.
(3) No civil penalty may be assessed unless the person charged was given
notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the Idaho administrative
procedure act.
(4) If the department is unable to collect such penalty or if any person
fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the
department, it may recover such amount by action in the appropriate district
court.
(5) Any person against which the department has assessed a civil
penalty under the provisions of this section may, within thirty (30) days of
the final action by the agency making the assessment, appeal the assessment
to the district court of the county in which the violation is alleged by the
department to have occurred.
(6) All civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be re-
mitted to the department.
SECTION 9. That Section 22-2812, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


22-2812. "STOP SALE, USE, OR REMOVAL" ORDERS. (1) In the event the
department finds that honey is being offered for sale in violation of this
chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter, the department may issue
and enforce a written or printed "stop sale, use, or removal" order to the
distributor, owner or custodian of the honey and hold the honey, or order it
held, at a designated place until the law has been complied with and the honey
is released in writing by the department, or the violation has been otherwise
legally disposed of by written authority. Unless the department grants a
written extension, the owner or custodian of any honey that has been issued a
"stop sale, use, or removal" order shall remedy the violation within thirty
(30) days. The department shall release the honey so withdrawn when the re-
quirements of this chapter have been complied with and all costs and expenses
incurred in connection with the withdrawal have been paid.
(2) Any lot of honey not in compliance with the provisions of this chap-
ter, or rules promulgated under this chapter, shall be subject to seizure on
complaint of the commission to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area
in which said honey is located. In the event the court finds the said honey
to be in violation of the provisions of this chapter and orders the condemna-
tion of said honey, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the
quality of the honey and the laws of the state. Provided however, that in no
instance shall the disposition of said honey be ordered by the court without
first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of
said honey or for permission to process or relabel said honey to bring it into
compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 10. That Section 22-2813, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2813. PAYMENT OF EXPENSES AND COSTS. All expenses and costs in-
curred in the administration of this chapter shall be paid out of the Idaho
honey fund. The commission shall keep an accurate record of all costs and
expenditures and will report the same by publication on October 1st 1 of each
year. All expenses and costs incurred and contracted for by the commission
in performing its duties under this chapter shall be paid out of such Idaho
honey fund in the following manner: vouchers shall be approved and submitted
by the commission chairman to the director or his designated representative
of the Idaho state department of agriculture for approval and subsequent
issuance of a warrant by the state controller.
SECTION 11. That Section 22-2815, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 12. The rules contained in IDAPA 02.06.16, Department of
Agriculture, relating to Idaho Honey Commission, Rules Governing Honey
Standards, shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July
1, 2026.
SECTION 13. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.